California statutes. Education Code
If no one has been nominated to an office, prior to making an appointment to that office pursuant to Section 5328, the governing board shall cause to be published a notice once in a newspaper of general circulation published in the district or, if no such newspaper is published in the district, in a newspaper having general circulation in the district, stating that the board intends to make an appointment and informing persons of the procedure available for applying for the office.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 428, Sec. 10.5.)
-------------------------------------------

5329.

Whenever a candidate has filed a declaration of candidacy the name of the candidate shall be printed upon the ballot unless the candidate has died and that fact has been ascertained by the officer charged with the duty of printing the ballots at least 68 days before the election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 866, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Consolidation of Elections [5340. - 5345.]

5340.

School district governing board or community college district governing board member elections for two or more districts of any type to be held in the same district or area on the same day shall be consolidated so that a person entitled to vote in both or all of such elections may do so at the same time and place and using the same ballot.

When a consolidated election is required by this section to be held, the basic unit for conducting the election shall be the elementary district. The county superintendent of schools having jurisdiction shall notify the governing boards of all school and community college districts in writing at least 130 days prior to the date of the election that a consolidated election is required to be held.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 428, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

5342.

Whenever any school district election or community college district election is scheduled to be held on the same day, in the same territory, or in territory that is in part the same, as an election or elections called to be held by any other district, city, county, or other political subdivision, the district election may be either completely or partially consolidated with the election or elections pursuant to Part 3 (commencing with Section 10400) of Division 10 of the Elections Code.

The consolidation may be effected by the officer conducting the election upon receipt of resolutions from two or more political subdivisions whose boundaries are totally or partially the same territory calling elections to be held on the same day if the resolutions are delivered to the officer conducting the election at least 88 days prior to the date of the election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 923, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

5343.

If any school district election or community college district election is completely or partially consolidated with any other election, the notice of election need not set forth the precincts, place or places of holding the election, or the names of the officers appointed to conduct the election, but may instead state that the precincts, place or places of holding the elections and officers appointed to conduct the election shall be the same as those provided for such other election within the territory affected by the consolidation and set forth in the ordinance, order, resolution, or notice calling, providing for or giving notice of such other election, and reference shall be made to such ordinance, order, resolution, or notice by number and title or date of adoption, or by date or proposed date of publication and the name of the newspaper in which publication has been or will be made, or by any other definite description, except that no such reference need be made if the election is completely or partially consolidated with a statewide election.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

5344.

Within the territory affected by the order of consolidation the election precincts, polling places, voting booths and polling hours shall, in every case, be the same and there shall be only one set of election officers in each of the precincts. When the returns of elections consolidated pursuant to Part 3 (commencing with Section 10400) of Division 10 of the Elections Code are required to be canvassed by different canvassing boards, the elections shall be conducted separately in the same manner as if they had not been consolidated, except as provided in this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 923, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

5345.

In the event of consolidation of any school district election or community college district election with any other election the provisions of law governing such other election with respect to the manner of marking ballots shall also apply to the district election consolidated therewith.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Election Notice [5360. - 5363.]

5360.

As used in this chapter “formal notice” means the notice of election which is required to be published and posted in public places, and “card notice” means the notice of election which is required to be mailed to the registered voters of the area in which the election is to be held.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

5361.

The formal notice of election for any school district election or community college district election, except a bond measure election, shall be prepared by the county superintendent of schools and shall contain the following:

(a) The date of the election.

(b) The purpose of the election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 667, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

5362.

As an alternative to publication by newspaper pursuant to Section 5363, publication of formal notice may be effected pursuant to this section. Not later than 90 days prior to the date of any school district or community college district election, except a bond measure election, the county superintendent of schools having jurisdiction shall cause to be posted the formal notice of the election in public view at all of the following:

(a) Every schoolhouse in the territory, district or districts in which the election is to be held.

(b) At three public places in the territory, district or districts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 667, Sec. 4.5.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

5363.

Except where the procedure prescribed by Section 5362 is utilized, the elections official responsible for the conduct of a governing board member election shall cause formal notice of the election to be published pursuant to Section 12112 of the Elections Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1081, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Precinct Election Officers [5380. - 5380.]

5380.

Any election officer serving at any school district election or community college district election may be paid out of the funds of the district as compensation for his or her services as an election officer a sum determined by the county elections official and approved by the county board of supervisors, not to exceed the amount paid from the county treasury to officers of the preceding general election. In districts in which the polls are kept open less than 12 hours, the maximum compensation for election officers shall be the sum bearing the same relation to the amount paid to election officers of the last preceding general election as the number of hours the polls were open at the election bears to the number of hours the polls were open in the preceding general election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Voters and Election Procedure [5390. - 5390.]

5390.

In any school district or community college district election, the qualifications of voters, the procedure to be followed by voters and precinct board members in the polling places on election day, and the equipment and supplies to be furnished each polling place shall be governed by those provisions of the Elections Code applicable to statewide elections.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 219.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Cost of Elections [5420. - 5426.]

5420.

The cost of any school district or community college district election may include, but need not be limited to:

(a) Compensation of precinct election officers.

(b) Publication of notices.

(c) The cost of printing official ballots, sample ballots, indexes, arguments, statements, official notices, and card notices.

(d) Mailing charges for card notices, arguments, recommendations, statements, and sample ballots.

(e) Forms for rosters, tally sheets, certificates, envelopes, declaration of results forms, and legal forms required for bond elections.

(f) Precinct maps.

(g) The actual cost of supplies such as flags, ballot boxes, chairs and tables, booths, ink pads and stamps, and pencils; provided, that if any such can be borrowed from any state or county office, no charge for rental shall be included in the cost of elections.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

5421.

The cost of any election held within a single district shall be borne by the entire district, and shall be paid out of its funds. Election costs shall be determined by the county elections official and approved by the county board of supervisors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

5422.

The cost of elections, including consolidated elections, held in territory common to two or more districts shall be borne by the districts concerned in equal shares and paid from district funds.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

5423.

The cost of consolidated governing board elections shall be paid by the county superintendent of schools having jurisdiction from the county school service fund, and the cost shall be prorated among the districts concerned to reimburse the fund.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

5424.

The cost of any recall election shall be borne by the district in which the recall election is held and paid from district funds.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

5425.

The cost of the election for the formation of a community college district shall be paid from the county general fund.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

5426.

The cost of any election held under the provisions of Article 8 (commencing with Section 4400) of Chapter 2 of Part 3 of this division, or Article 7 (commencing with Section 35690) of Chapter 3 of Part 21 of Division 3 of Title 2, or Article 3 (commencing with Section 74630) of Chapter 5 of Part 46 of Division 7 of Title 3, where the election is being held for the assumption of bonded indebtedness of the district to which the territory is being transferred or where the county board of supervisors requires an election to be held in the whole district from which the territory would be transferred, shall be paid from the county general fund.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Miscellaneous Provisions [5440. - 5442.]

5440.

The provisions of Division 16 (commencing with Section 16000) of the Elections Code, relating to election contests shall apply to school district elections.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 923, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

5441.

The returns of any school district or community college district election received by the county elections official having jurisdiction shall, after the date of the declaration and certification of the final results of the election, be disposed of as follows:

(a) The sealed envelope containing the voted ballots, including ballots rejected for improper markings, shall be kept by the county superintendent unopened and unaltered for six months. If a contest or criminal prosecution is not commenced within the six-months’ period as provided in Division 16 (commencing with Section 16000) of the Elections Code, he or she shall destroy the envelope, or have it destroyed, without its being opened or its contents examined. This paragraph also applies to absent ballots and identification envelopes.

(b) The envelope containing spoiled, canceled, and defaced unused ballots shall remain unopened in the custody of the county superintendent and shall be held and disposed of as is the envelope provided for in paragraph (a) of this section.

(c) The envelope containing the tally sheet, challenge sheet, challenge list, assisted voter list, and affidavits of election officers assisting voters, shall be disposed of in the same manner, but the contents of this envelope may be made available to voters for inspection at any time following commencement of the official canvass of votes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 923, Sec. 19.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

5442.

Recount of votes in any school district or community college district shall be governed by Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 15600) of Division 15 of the Elections Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 588, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



  PART 5. PUBLIC SCHOOL PERSONNEL [7000. - 7058.]



  CHAPTER 1. Personnel General Provisions [7000. - 7058.]



  ARTICLE 1. Health and Welfare Benefits [7000. - 7008.]

7000.

(a) Notwithstanding Article 1 (commencing with Section 53200) of Chapter 2 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code, a county superintendent of schools, a school district, or a community college district, which provides health and welfare benefits or dental care benefits for the benefit of its certificated employees, shall permit enrollment in, respectively, the health and welfare benefit plan or dental care benefit plan currently provided for its current certificated employees by any former certificated employee thereof who retired therefrom under any public retirement system and his or her spouse and by any surviving spouse of a former certificated employee thereof who either retired therefrom under any public retirement system or was, at the time of death, both employed thereby in a position requiring contributions to the State Teachers’ Retirement System and a member of the State Teachers’ Retirement System.

This subdivision does not apply to either the new spouse upon the remarriage of a surviving spouse of a former certificated employee or the children of a certificated or former certificated employee.

(b) A county superintendent of schools or district may develop an experience claims rating for the persons specified in subdivision (a) and may, if appropriate, require those persons to pay different rates as a class. Any plan pursuant to this article shall provide separate single and two-party rates for at least the following classes: for those under 65, for those over 65 who have Medicare A and B, and for those over 65 who do not have Medicare A.

(c) The county superintendent of schools, school district, or community college district shall annually select a one-month period during which persons described by subdivision (a) may elect to enroll in, respectively, the health and welfare benefit plan or the dental care benefit plan or change their enrollment from one to another health and welfare plan or dental care benefit plan, respectively.

(d) A certificated school employee who retired on or before August 24, 1986, the effective date of Chapter 561 of the Statutes of 1986, or the surviving spouse of a certificated employee retired as of August 25, 1986, shall be permitted to enroll in any district health and dental care plan during the 1986, 1987, and 1988 enrollment periods.

(e) A certificated school employee who retires after August 24, 1986, the effective date of Chapter 561 of the Statutes of 1986, or the surviving spouse of a certificated employee retired as of August 25, 1986, shall be allowed to enroll in the coverage provided by this article within 30 days of losing active employee coverage, but if the retiree does not enroll in a district health or dental care plan during this initial enrollment period, the retiree may be denied further opportunity to do so.

The enrollment period for retirees under this subdivision shall correspond to that provided to active employees, unless a district chooses to offer an additional enrollment period.

(f) This article shall permit enrollment into any district health and dental care plan only once. A retiree or spouse or surviving spouse of a certificated employee who has been previously covered under this article and who has voluntarily terminated that coverage, thereafter may be excluded from obtaining coverage under this article. This subdivision does not apply to a person who is changing plans within a district during an open enrollment period.

(g) Retirees or surviving spouses of certificated employees may be enrolled in a medical care plan pursuant to this section during periods other than those specified therein if they lose their coverage. With documentation of prior coverage, they may be allowed to enroll in a medical care plan, if they do so within 31 days of losing their other coverage.

(h) Any person described by subdivision (a) who elects, pursuant to this article, to be covered by, respectively, a health and welfare benefit plan or dental care benefit plan, may be required to pay all premiums, dues, and other charges, including any increases in the rate of premiums or dues for these persons, and all costs incurred by the district or county superintendent of schools in administering this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 42.)
-------------------------------------------

7000.3.

Enrollment in Medicare A shall not be a prerequisite for enrollment in any district health plan pursuant to this article. However, the purchase of Medicare B may be required for enrollment if the participant qualifies to purchase it. In addition, a district health plan may be restructured to pay benefits as if each participant is enrolled in Medicare B as soon as the participant qualifies to purchase Medicare B.

A health plan may condition eligibility for enrollment on the effective assignment of any Medicare benefits for which the enrollee would be eligible.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 561, Sec. 3.   Effective August 25, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

7000.5.

(a) Any health benefits plan provided by any county superintendent of schools, school district, or community college district pursuant to this article may contain a preexisting condition exclusion, as follows:

(1) The coverage of any person who has a break in coverage, may, for the first three months after reenrollment, exclude any care received for a condition which is caused by, or results from, a condition existing at the time of reenrollment or for which the person received medical advice or treatment during the six-month period immediately preceding reenrollment.

(2) Coverage of any person who is confined to a hospital or his or her home for medical treatment at the time of enrollment in a health plan pursuant to this section shall exclude any benefits until the period commencing on the 15th day following the termination of that confinement.

(b) This section does not apply to any entity which provides a health benefits plan which contains a preexisting condition exclusion.

(c) This section does not apply to any changes in enrollment by a person currently enrolled in a school district’s health benefits plan or due to any change in enrollment or coverage caused by the retirement of a person.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 561, Sec. 4.   Effective August 25, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

7002.5.

(a) This article does not create a vested retirement right in health and dental care benefits.

(b) The individual districts, the county office, a health plan, an entity providing or arranging a health plan, and the State Teachers’ Retirement System do not have any legal duty to contact retired teachers or surviving spouses of certificated employees with regard to this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 86.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

7003.

(a) Nothing in this article shall be construed as requiring or permitting the impairment of any contract, board rule, or regulation affecting retired certificated personnel, in existence on the effective date of this article.

(b) Nothing in this article is intended to reduce or conflict with any benefit provided in the federal Consolidated Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1986 (Public Law 99-272).

(c) Nothing in this article mandates the provision of life insurance or vision care.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 561, Sec. 7.   Effective August 25, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

7004.

As used in this article:

(a) “Certificated employee” means a member, as defined by Section 22146, of the State Teachers’ Retirement System.

(b) “School district” means that district from which the member of the State Teachers’ Retirement System last made contributions to the system before retirement.

(c) “Spouse” means a spouse as defined by Section 22171.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 896, Sec. 5.   Effective September 29, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

7005.

This article does not apply to persons receiving benefits pursuant to the Public Employees’ Medical and Hospital Care Act (Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 22750) of Part 5 of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code) and to the employers on which their benefits are based.

For purposes of this section, “employer” means a county superintendent of schools, a school district, or a community college district irrespective of whether employees may be represented by different bargaining groups. Notwithstanding any other provision of this part, this article does not apply to employers for those groups of employees for whom coverage under the Public Employees’ Medical and Hospital Care Act (Part 5 (commencing with Section 22750) of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code) is provided by contract.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 69, Sec. 1.   Effective June 24, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

7007.

(a) Any qualified organization, as defined in subdivision (b), in cooperation with the Public Employees’ Retirement System, may develop a health benefits plan which would be available to persons who are members of those organizations, with equal premiums for both active and retired teachers. The plan would be available, on an optional basis, to each school district, county board of education, and a county superintendent of schools which becomes a contracting agency with the Public Employees’ Retirement System pursuant to Section 22857 of the Government Code.

(b) “Qualified organization” means an exclusive representative of the certificated or classified employees, as defined by Section 3540.1 of the Government Code, or any organization with a membership of at least 1,000 members who are retirees of the State Teachers’ Retirement System, or any organization with a membership of at least 1,000 members who are faculty members in the California Community Colleges.

(c) This section shall not apply to any contracting agency unless and until the agency elects to be subject to this section pursuant to Section 22857 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 896, Sec. 6.   Effective September 29, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

7008.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a member of the Defined Benefit Program of the State Teachers’ Retirement Plan who is disabled as a result of an injury that is a direct consequence of a violent act perpetrated on his or her person while performing duties in the scope of employment, and the employment is creditable under the provisions of the Teachers’ Retirement Law (Part 13 (commencing with Section 22000)), may, upon qualifying for a disability under Section 24001 and while receiving an allowance under Section 24002, continue in the district’s health care plan and dental care plan by paying all of the employer’s and employee’s premiums and all of the related administrative costs of the employer.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a school member as defined in Section 20370 of the Government Code, or a local police officer as defined in Section 20430 of the Government Code, who is disabled as a result of an injury that is a direct consequence of a violent act perpetrated on his or her person while performing duties in the scope of employment, and the employment is creditable under the Public Employees’ Retirement Law (Part 3 (commencing with Section 20000) of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code), may, upon qualifying for a disability and while receiving an allowance under Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 21060) of Part 3 of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code, continue in the employer’s health care plan and dental care plan by paying all of the employer’s and employee’s premiums and all of the related administrative costs of the employer.

(c) Subdivisions (a) and (b) do not apply to any member who is employed by a school district that contracts with the Public Employees’ Retirement System for health care coverage under the Public Employees’ Medical and Health Care Act, (Part 5 (commencing with Section 22750) of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 69, Sec. 2.   Effective June 24, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Political Activities of School Officers and Employees [7050. - 7058.]

7050.

The Legislature finds that political activities of school employees are of significant statewide concern. The provisions of this article shall supersede all provisions on this subject in any city, county, or city and county charter as well as in the general law of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

7051.

This article applies to all officers and employees of a local agency.

“Local agency” means a county superintendent of schools, an elementary, high, or unified school district, or a community college district.

Officers and employees of a given local agency include officers and employees of any other local agency whose principal duties consist of providing services to the given local agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

7052.

Except as otherwise provided in this article, or as necessary to meet requirements of federal law as it pertains to a particular employee or employees, no restriction shall be placed on the political activities of any officer or employee of a local agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

7053.

No one who holds, or who is seeking election or appointment to, any office or employment in a local agency shall, directly or indirectly, use, promise, threaten or attempt to use, any office, authority, or influence, whether then possessed or merely anticipated, to confer upon or secure for any person, or to aid or obstruct any person in securing, or to prevent any person from securing, any position, nomination, confirmation, promotion, change in compensation or position, within the local agency upon consideration or condition that the vote or political influence or action of such person or another shall be given or used in behalf of, or withheld from, any candidate, officer, or party, or upon any other corrupt condition or consideration. The prohibitions of this section shall apply to either urging or discouraging any political action of an employee.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

7054.

(a) No school district or community college district funds, services, supplies, or equipment shall be used for the purpose of urging the support or defeat of any ballot measure or candidate, including, but not limited to, any candidate for election to the governing board of the district.

(b) Nothing in this section shall prohibit the use of any of the public resources described in subdivision (a) to provide information to the public about the possible effects of any bond issue or other ballot measure if both of the following conditions are met:

(1) The informational activities are otherwise authorized by the Constitution
 or laws of this state.

(2) The information provided constitutes a fair and impartial presentation of relevant facts to aid the electorate in reaching an informed judgment regarding the bond issue or ballot measure.

(c) A violation of this section shall be a misdemeanor or felony punishable by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year or by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both, or imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code for 16 months, or two or three years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 56.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

7054.1.

Nothing in this article shall be construed as prohibiting any administrative officer or board member of a school district or community college district from appearing at any time before a citizens’ group that requests the appearance of the officer or board member for purposes of discussing the reasons why the governing board of the district called an election to submit to the voters of the district a proposition for the issuance of bonds and for purposes of responding to inquiries from the citizens’ group.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 879, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

7055.

The governing body of each local agency may establish rules and regulations on the following:

(a) Officers and employees engaging in political activity during working hours.

(b) Political activities on the premises of the local agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

7056.

(a) Nothing in this article prevents an officer or employee of a local agency from soliciting or receiving political funds or contributions to promote the support or defeat a ballot measure that would affect the rate of pay, hours of work, retirement, civil service, or other working conditions of officers or employees of the local agency. These activities are prohibited during working hours. In addition, entry into buildings and grounds under the control of a local agency for such purposes during working hours is also prohibited.

(b) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit any recognized employee organization or its officers, agents, and representatives from soliciting or receiving political funds or contributions from employee members to promote the support or defeat of any ballot measure on school district property or community college district property during nonworking time. As used in this subdivision, “nonworking time” means time outside an employee’s working hours, whether before or after school or during the employee’s luncheon period or other scheduled work intermittency during the schoolday.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 879, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

7057.

No person who is in the classified service or who is upon any eligibility list shall be appointed, demoted, or removed, or in any way discriminated against because of his political acts, opinions, or affiliations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

7058.

Nothing in this article shall prohibit the use of a forum under the control of the governing board of a school district or community college district if the forum is made available to all sides on an equitable basis.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 879, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  PART 6. EDUCATION PROGRAMS—STATE MASTER PLANS [8006. - 9004.]



  CHAPTER 1. Career Technical Education [8006. - 8155.]



  ARTICLE 1. Career Technical Education Staff and Reports [8006. - 8008.]

8006.

(a) There is, in the State Department of Education a career technical education staff responsible for the design, implementation, and maintenance of a basic integrated statewide information system for career technical education and technical training. The Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges shall collect and maintain information related to career technical education and technical training within the California Community Colleges for inclusion within the integrated statewide information system.

(b) The data gathering and analysis capabilities of the system described in subdivision (a) shall include, but not be limited to, maintaining comprehensive inventory of all programs of all career technical education and technical training programs which are maintained by the public schools.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1058, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

8008.

The system provided for in Section 8006, within the State Department of Education, shall be designed, implemented, and maintained in accordance with Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 10600) of Part 7.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 48.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Local Advisory Committees [8070. - 8070.]

8070.

The governing board of each school district participating in a career technical education program shall appoint a career technical education advisory committee to develop recommendations on the program and to provide liaison between the district and potential employers.

The committee shall consist of one or more representatives of the general public knowledgeable about the disadvantaged, students, teachers, business, industry, school administration, and the field office of the Department of Employment Development.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1058, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Career Technical Education Contracts [8090. - 8093.]

8090.

Any state agency, including but not limited to school districts, and any community organization organized pursuant to the Economic Opportunity Act of 1964 (P.L. 452, 88th Congress (78 Stat. 508)) or any other similar training or retraining program authorized by the federal or state governments, may enter into contracts with private business, trade and technical schools to provide training and retraining programs when such private business, trade and technical schools have facilities available to provide such training and retraining. The attendance of pupils in courses of a private school pursuant to a contract authorized by this section shall not be counted for reporting to the Department of Education for the purpose of receiving apportionments from the State School Fund unless such contract also meets the requirements of Section 8092.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

8091.

Any state agency, including but not limited to local school districts, community college districts and any community organization organized pursuant to the Economic Opportunity Act of 1964 (Public Law 452, 88th Congress (78 Stat. 508)) or any other similar training or retraining program authorized by the federal or state governments, may use any federal, state, local, or private funds to provide training or retraining programs operated by private business, trade and technical schools.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

8092.

(a) A school district or districts, a county superintendent or superintendents, or the governing body of any agency maintaining a regional occupational center or program may contract with a private postsecondary school that is authorized or approved pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 94300) of Part 59 and that has been in operation not less than two full calendar years prior to the effective date of the contract, to provide career technical skill training authorized by this code. A school district, community college district, or county superintendent of schools may contract with an activity center, work activity center, or sheltered workshop to provide career technical skill training authorized by this code in an adult education program for adults with disabilities operated pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 41976.

(b) A contract between a public entity and a private postsecondary school entered into pursuant to this section, or an activity center, work activity center, or sheltered workshop, shall do all of the following:

(1) Provide that the amount contracted for per student shall not exceed the total direct and indirect costs to provide the same training in the public schools or the tuition the private postsecondary school charges its private students, whichever is lower.

(2) Provide that the public school receiving training in a private postsecondary school, or an activity center, work activity center, or sheltered workshop pursuant to that contract may not be charged additional tuition for any training included in the contract. The attendance of those students pursuant to a contract authorized by this section shall be credited to the public entity for the purposes of apportionments from the State School Fund.

(3) Provide that all programs, courses, and classes of instruction shall meet the standards set forth in the California State Plan for Career Technical Education, or is a course of study for adult schools approved by the department under Section 51056.

(c) The students who attend a private postsecondary school or an activity center, work activity center, or sheltered workshop pursuant to a contract under this section shall be enrollees of the public entity and the career technical instruction provided pursuant to that contract shall be under the exclusive control and management of the governing body of the contracting public entity.

(d) The Department of Finance and the State Department of Education may audit the accounts of both the public entity and the private party involved in these contracts to the extent necessary to ensure the integrity of the public funds involved.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 677, Sec. 4.   Effective October 7, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

8092.5.
